Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,116
Commission; members; removal; procedure.

Members may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, misconduct in office, mental or physical disability, or for taking part in activities prohibited by section 49-14,114 or 49-14,115, but only after delivering to the member a copy of the charges and affording him an opportunity to be publicly heard in person, or by counsel, in his own defense, upon not less than ten days' notice. Such hearing shall be held before the Governor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 116.